Hawaii statutes.
§326-11 Voluntary transfer to and from
Kalaupapa. Any person undergoing treatment and receiving care for Hansen's
disease at Hale Mohalu on June 30, 1969, may be transferred to Kalaupapa
for care and treatment if the person desires. Any person who may undergo
treatment and receive care for Hansen's disease at Hale Mohalu after
June 30, 1969, may apply to the director of health for transfer to
Kalaupapa. Any person undergoing treatment and receiving care for Hansen's
disease at Kalaupapa may be transferred to Hale Mohalu for care and treatment
if the person desires. A person transferred may be retransferred to Kalaupapa
if the person desires. [L 1953, JR 41, §1; RL 1955, §50-13; am L Sp 1959 2d, c
1, §19; HRS §326-11; am L 1969, c 152, §4; am L 1981, c 185, §8; am L 1985, c
250, §6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next